Hawaii, session 2025, HB1424.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that for fiscal year 2025, the executive branch had requested about $3,600,000,000 in funding for more than forty-seven thousand permanent and three thousand six hundred temporary authorized positions.  The amount requested accounted for more than twenty per cent of all authorized funds in fiscal year 2025. The legislature further finds that there has been a high vacancy rate in public employment positions and funds are either transferred or used for purposes that are not consistent with the purpose for which the appropriation was authorized.  A vacancy report from December 2024 from the department of human resources development identified four thousand eighty-five vacancies, or about twenty-four per cent of civil service positions, in the State. The purpose of this Act is to ensure that funds appropriated by the legislature are used for their intended purpose by prohibiting the transfer of funds appropriated for positions to operating expenses, and vice versa, except to fulfill the legislature's purpose for which the funds were appropriated. SECTION 2.  Chapter 37, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new section to part II to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§37-     Appropriated funds; transfers prohibited.  No department or agency shall transfer funds, or authorize the transfer of funds, appropriated for: (1)  Positions to operating expenses; or (2)  Operating expenses to fund positions, except to fulfill the legislature's purpose for which the funds were appropriated." SECTION 3.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 4.  This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________